src/morphology/stems/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON ateq
AaB Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Aarup Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Access Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Aeroflot Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Agippa Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Aidt Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Akselsen Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Alexandersen Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Alstrup Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Amundsen Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Andreson Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Arctic% Winter% Games Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Arnstrup Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Askildsen Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Atassut Zateq_tptZmorf ;
Atuarfik% Kilaaseeraq	Z1ateq+qaZmorf ;	
Atuarfik% Samuel% Kleinschmidt	Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Aviannguaq Z1nnguaq_ateqZmorf ;
B&O Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
BZ Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Bagenkop Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Balskov Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Barfoed Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Basselbjerg Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Bayraktar Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Bengtsson Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Bernikow Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Birkegaard Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Blegdamshospitalet Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Boesgaard Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Borg Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Branner Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Brogaard Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Buchwald Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Burg Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Bærentzen Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Cadillac Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Cavling Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
ClarisWorks Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Crockett Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
DEMKO Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
DPF Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
DR1 Zateq_numCZmorf ;
DR2 Zateq_numVZmorf ;
Daimler-Benz Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Danholz Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Dantap Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Demokraatit+Err/Sub:Demokrati Z1ateqPZmorf ;
Demokraatit:Demokraati Z1ateqPZmorf ;
Dickens Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Drewsen Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
EIB Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Ehrenskjöld Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Ellos Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Engström Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Ewers Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Fadden Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Fernandes Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Fodnes Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Frankenstein Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Frøkjær Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Gammel% Dansk Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Gjellerup Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Gottfredsen Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Groth Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Guldbrandsen Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
HS Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Halleløv Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Hartung Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Heerup Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Helmersen Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Hewlett-Packard Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Hjulmand Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Holsen Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Hovgaard Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Høegh-Guldberg Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
ICAO Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Inatsisartut:Inatsisartoq Z1ateqPZmorf ;
Ingebretsen Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Itsinnguaq Z1nnguaq_ateqZmorf ;
Jackson Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Jerichow Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Jonsson Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Jürgensen Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Kaalannguaq Z1nnguaq_ateqZmorf ;
Kasparov Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Kirkegaard Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Klemmensen Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Kohl Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Kreiner Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Kusk Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Landrover Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Laxness Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Lindegaard Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Lorentsen Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Lykkegaard Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Macdowell Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Malersorninnguaq Z1nnguaq_ateqZmorf ;
Marienborg Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Mccann-Erickson Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Merkurius Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Mohn Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Munkedal Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
NDR Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Naalakkersuisut:Naalakkersuisoq Z1ateqPZmorf ;
Namminersorlutik% Oqartussat Z1ateqPZmorf ;
Namminersornerullutik% Oqartussat Z1ateqPZmorf ;
Nellemann Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Nissen Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Nystad Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Oehlenschläger Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Oqaasiliortut:Oqaasiliortoq Z1ateqPZmorf ;
Orff Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Padella Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Persen Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Pikiulinnguaq Z1nnguaq_ateqZmorf ;
Pioneer Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Press Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Qvist Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Raychem Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Reuters Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Rolandsen Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Rudbjerg Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
SF Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Sandbygaard Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Scheel Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Schneevoigt Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Schønberg Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Severinsen Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Siumut Z2-ateq_specielSZmorf ; !går til eget katalog
Sjuganov Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Sleeman Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Sonnichsen Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Steenskov Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Stokholm Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Sunesen Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Sølyst Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Teknoplast Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Therkildsen Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Thueslev Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Tophøj Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Tuekær Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
UNIX Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Usisaat Zateq_tptZmorf ;
VU Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Vestfyen Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Volkswagen Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Watkins Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Westermann Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Williamson Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Wroldsen Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
eBay Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Øverland Zateq_oqsZmorf ;
Kalaallit% Atuakkiortut@U.Num.Pl@:Kalaallit% Atuakkiortoq@U.Num.Pl@	Z1ateqPZmorf ;
Peugeot% 2%06    Zateq_numCZmorf ;
Peugeot% 2%08    Zateq_numVZmorf ;
